Michigan, session 2025-2026, SB1045.
people of the state of michigan enact: Sec. 510. (1) "Income" means the sum of federal adjusted gross income as defined in the internal revenue code plus all income specifically excluded or exempt from the computations of the federal adjusted gross income. Also, a person an individual who is enrolled in an accident or health insurance plan may deduct from income the amount that person individual paid in premiums in the tax year for that insurance plan for the person's individual's family. Income does not include any of the following: (a) The first $300.00 of gifts in cash or kind from nongovernmental sources. (b) The first $300.00 received from awards, prizes, lottery, bingo, or other gambling winnings. (c) Surplus foods. (d) Relief in kind supplied by a governmental agency. (e) Payments or credits under this part. (f) A governmental grant that has to be used by the claimant for rehabilitation of the claimant's homestead. (g) Stipends received by a person an individual 60 years of age or older who is acting as a foster grandparent under the foster grandparent program authorized pursuant to section 211 of part B of title II of the domestic volunteer service act of 1973, Public Law 93-113, 42 USC 5011, or who is acting as a senior companion pursuant to section 213 of part C of title II of the domestic volunteer service act of 1973, Public Law 93-113, 42 USC 5013. (h) Amounts deducted from monthly social security or railroad retirement benefits for medicare premiums. (i) Contributions by an employer to life, accident, or health insurance plans. (j) Energy assistance grants and energy assistance tax credits. (2) "Owner" means a natural person an individual who owns or is purchasing a homestead under a mortgage or land contract, who owns or is purchasing a dwelling situated on the leased lands of another, or who is a tenant-stockholder of a cooperative housing corporation, or who is a grantor who has placed the homestead in a revocable trust or a qualified personal residence trust.